Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2221
Laws applicable.

A company licensed to issue variable annuities in this state shall be subject to all of the provisions of Chapter 44, relating to a company authorized to do a life insurance business in this state, which are not inconsistent with sections 44-2201 to 44-2221.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 21, p. 1267.